California, session 20252026, AB2761.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 271 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:271. “Crash” has the same meaning as “accident” or “collision.”SEC. 2. Section 2407 of the Vehicle Code is repealed.2407.The department shall prepare and on request supply to police departments, coroners, sheriffs, and other suitable agencies or individuals, forms for accident reports required under this code, which reports shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose with reference to a traffic accident the cause, conditions then existing, and the persons and vehicles involved.SEC. 3. Section 2407 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:2407. (a) By January 1, 2030, the department shall prescribe the minimum requirements to document traffic crashes and determine the method and standards for electronically submitting all crash investigation reports by providing a crash investigation report system to police departments, coroners, sheriffs, and other suitable agencies or individuals to be used in the documentation of traffic crashes as required pursuant to this code.(b) The requirements developed by the department pursuant to this section are exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).SEC. 4. Section 2408 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:2408. The department shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports maintain a database of all crash investigation reports to analyze and publish annually or at more frequent intervals statistical information based thereon as to the number and location of traffic accidents, crashes, as well as other information relating to traffic accident crash prevention. Based upon its findings after such analysis, the department may conduct further necessary detailed research to more fully determine the cause and control of highway accidents. crashes. It may further conduct experimental field tests within areas of the State to prove the practicability of various ideas advanced in traffic control and accident crash prevention.SEC. 5. Section 20008 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20008. (a) The driver of a vehicle, other than a common carrier vehicle, involved in any accident a crash resulting in injuries to or death of any a person shall within 24 hours after the accident crash make or cause to be made a written report of the accident crash to the Department of the California Highway Patrol or, if the accident crash occurred within a city, to either the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the police department of the city in which the accident crash occurred. If the agency which that receives the report is not responsible for investigating the accident, crash, it shall immediately forward the report to the law enforcement agency which that is responsible for investigating the accident. crash.On or before the fifth day of each month, every police department which received a report during the previous calendar month of an accident which it is responsible for investigating shall forward the report or a copy thereof to the main office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol at Sacramento.(b) A law enforcement agency shall document traffic crashes in accordance with Section 2407, and shall electronically submit the completed crash investigation reports in the timeframe prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.(b)(c) The owner or driver of a common carrier vehicle involved in any such accident a crash shall make a like report to the Department of California Highway Patrol on or before the 10th day of the month following the accident. crash.SEC. 6. Section 20011 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20011. A coroner or medical examiner shall shall, on or before the 10th day of each month month, report in writing electronically, in accordance with Section 2407, to the Department of the California Highway Patrol the death of any person during the preceding calendar month as the result of an accident a traffic crash involving a motor vehicle and vehicle, along with the circumstances of the accident. crash. Chemical test results, including blood alcohol content and blood drug concentrations, shall be reported in writing when available.SEC. 7. Section 20012 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20012. (a) All required accident crash investigation reports, and supplemental reports, shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, except that the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the law enforcement agency to whom the accident crash was reported shall disclose the entire contents of the reports, including, but not limited to, the names and addresses of persons involved or injured in, or witnesses to, an accident, a crash, the registration numbers and descriptions of vehicles involved, the date, time and location of an accident, a crash, all diagrams, statements of the drivers involved or occupants injured in the accident crash and the statements of all witnesses, to any person who may have a proper interest therein, including, but not limited to, the driver or drivers involved, or the guardian or conservator thereof, the parent of a minor driver, the authorized representative of a driver, or to any named person injured therein, the owners of vehicles or property damaged thereby, persons who may incur civil liability, including liability based upon a breach of warranty arising out of the accident, crash, and any attorney who declares under penalty of perjury that he or she represents they represent any of the above persons. persons described in this subdivision.A(b) A request for a printed copy of an accident a crash investigation report shall be accompanied by payment of a fee, provided such that fee shall not exceed the actual cost of providing the copy. An electronic copy of a crash investigation report shall be provided at no cost to the requester.SEC. 8. Section 20013 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20013. No such accident A crash investigation report shall not be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident, a crash, except that the department shall furnish upon demand of any person who has, or claims to have, made such a report or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident crash investigation report has or has not been made to the department solely to prove a compliance or failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made to the department.SEC. 9. Section 20014 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20014. All required accident crash investigation reports and supplemental reports and all reports made to the Department of the California Highway Patrol by any peace officer, other person assigned by a law enforcement agency to investigate crashes, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or other employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall be immediately available for the confidential use of any division in the department needing the same, for confidential use of the Department of Transportation, and, with respect to accidents crashes occurring on highways other than state highways, for the confidential use of the local authority having jurisdiction over the highway.SEC. 10. Section 22358.7 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:22358.7. (a) If the Department of Transportation or a local authority, after completing an engineering and traffic survey, finds that the speed limit is still more than is reasonable or safe, the Department of Transportation may or the local authority may, by ordinance, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit that has been reduced an additional five miles per hour for either or both of the following reasons:(1) The portion of highway has been designated as a safety corridor. The Department of Transportation or a local authority shall not deem more than one-fifth of their streets as safety corridors.(2) The portion of highway is adjacent to any land or facility that generates high concentrations of bicyclists or pedestrians, especially those from vulnerable groups such as children, seniors, persons with disabilities, and the unhoused.(b) (1) As used in this section, “safety corridor” shall be defined by the Department of Transportation in the next revision of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. In making this determination, the Department of Transportation shall consider highways that have the highest number of serious injuries and fatalities based on collision data that may be derived from, but not limited to, the Statewide Integrated Traffic Records System. crash data.(2) The Department of Transportation shall, in the next revision of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, determine what constitutes land or facilities that generate high concentrations of bicyclists and pedestrians, as used in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). In making this determination, the Department of Transportation shall consider density, road use type, and bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure present on a section of highway.(c) A peace officer shall issue only warning citations for violations of exceeding the speed limit by 10 miles per hour or less for the first 30 days that a lower speed limit is in effect as authorized by this section.SEC. 11. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 26500 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26500.(a)A person shall not sell, lease, or transfer firearms unless the person has been issued a license pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.(b)Any person violating this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________